Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 3
SEARCHES AND SEIZURES

16-3-301. Search warrants - issuance - grounds.

A search warrant authorized by this section may be issued by any judge of a court of record.

A search warrant may be issued under this section to search for and seize any property:

Which is stolen or embezzled; or

Which is designed or intended for use as a means of committing a criminal offense; or

Which is or has been used as a means of committing a criminal offense; or

The possession of which is illegal; or

Which would be material evidence in a subsequent criminal prosecution in this state or in another state; or

The seizure of which is expressly required, authorized, or permitted by any statute of this state; or

Which is kept, stored, maintained, transported, sold, dispensed, or possessed in violation of a statute of this state, under circumstances involving a serious threat to public safety or order or to public health; or

Which would aid in the detection of the whereabouts of or in the apprehension of a person for whom a lawful arrest warrant is outstanding.

A search warrant may be issued under this section to search for any person for whom a lawful arrest warrant is outstanding.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 200, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-301.

L. 85:

(2)(g) amended and (2)(h) and (3) added, p. 615, §§ 1, 2, effective June 2.

Cross references:

For provisions concerning search and seizure other than the provisions of this section and rule 41 of the Colorado Rules of Criminal Procedure, see § 7 of article II of the Colorado Constitution; for the issuance of search warrants under the "Colorado Children's Code", see §§ 19-1-112, 19-2-504, and 19-2-505.

16-3-301.1. Court orders for the production of records - definitions.

A judge of a court of record may order the production of records.

A court may order the production of records under this section to require the production of records in the actual or constructive control of a business entity:

That have been stolen or embezzled;

That are designed or intended for use as a means of committing a criminal offense;

That are or have been used as a means of committing a criminal offense;

The possession of which is illegal;

That would be material evidence in a subsequent criminal prosecution in this state, another state, or federal court;

The seizure of which is expressly required, authorized, or permitted by a statute of this state or the United States; or

That would aid in the detection of the whereabouts of or in the apprehension of a person for whom a lawful arrest order is outstanding.

A court shall order the production of records only on receipt of an affidavit sworn to or affirmed before the judge and relating facts sufficient to:

Identify or describe, as nearly as may be, the business entity that is in actual or constructive control of the records;

Identify or describe, as nearly as may be, the records that shall be produced;

Establish the grounds for issuance of the court order for production of records or probable cause to believe the grounds exist; and

Establish probable cause that the records described are in the actual or constructive control of the business entity.

The affidavit required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) may include sworn testimony reduced to writing and signed under oath by the witness giving the testimony before the issuance of the court order for the production of records. A copy of the affidavit and a copy of the transcript of testimony taken in support of the request for a court order for the production of records shall be attached to the court order for the production of records filed with the court.

If the court is satisfied that grounds for the application exist or that there is probable cause to believe that the grounds exist, the court shall issue a court order for the production of records, which shall:

Identify or describe, as nearly as may be, the business entity that is in actual or constructive control of the records;

Identify or describe, as nearly as may be, the records that shall be produced;

State the grounds or probable cause for its issuance; and

State the names of the persons whose affidavits or testimony have been taken in support of the motion.

The court order for the production of records may also contain other and further orders that the court deems necessary to comply with the provisions of this statute, or to provide for the custody or delivery to the proper person of the records produced and seized under the order, or otherwise to accomplish the purpose of the order.

Unless the court otherwise directs, every court order for the production of records shall authorize a Colorado criminal investigator or peace officer:

To serve the order during normal business hours of the business entity or at any other convenient time for the business entity that is in actual or constructive control of the records; and

To receive the records during normal business hours of the business entity that is in the actual or constructive control of the records.

A court order for the production of records may be granted to a Colorado criminal investigator or peace officer whose affidavit supports the issuance of the order. The Colorado criminal investigator or peace officer granted the order need not have authorization to execute a search warrant in the jurisdiction in which the business entity is located.

A court order for the production of records shall be served upon the business entity to whom it is directed within fourteen days after its date.

A court order for production of records may be served in the same manner as a summons in a civil action or by personal service on a manager or supervisor of the business entity that is in actual or constructive control of the records or through any electronic or other means established and utilized by the business to receive service of process.

A business entity that is properly served with a court order for the production of records shall deliver the records, or copies of the records, identified in the court order to the officer who is designated in the court order within thirty-five days after the date the court order is served. The business entity shall also provide a notarized attestation of accuracy that the records produced represent complete and accurate copies of all records identified in the court order that are in the actual or constructive control of the business entity. If the business entity does not produce all records identified in the court order for production of records, the records not produced shall be identified. The attestation of accuracy shall be signed by the records custodian, or an officer or director of the business entity, who shall attest to the truth of the attestation to the best of the person's knowledge, information, and belief. The attestation may also attest to any one or all of the following: That the records were made at or near the time by, or from information transmitted by, a person with knowledge; that the records were kept in the course of a regular business activity; and that it was the regular practice of the business to record the information contained in the records. The business entity need only provide a copy of the attestation at the time of providing the records to the officer and may provide the original of the attestation to the officer within fourteen days after providing the records. The records and attestation of accuracy shall be sufficient to establish the authenticity of the records produced, without further necessity of extrinsic evidence.

A business entity that is served with a court order for the production of records may file a motion in the court that issued the court order to allow for an extension of time in which to comply with the court order. The motion shall be filed within the time period required to produce the records. The motion shall state with particularity the reasons why the business entity cannot comply with the court order. The motion shall be served upon the Colorado criminal investigator or peace officer named in the court order.

Upon the filing of a motion for an extension of time, the court shall hold a hearing within fourteen days, unless the business entity and the Colorado criminal investigator or peace officer named in the court order agree to a later time. The court may grant an extension for a reasonable time for the business to produce the records upon good cause shown or by agreement with the Colorado criminal investigator or peace officer named in the court order.

Failure of the business entity to comply with the requirements of a court order for the production of records shall support a finding of contempt of court.

Upon receiving the records from the business entity, the criminal investigator or peace officer named in the court order shall file a return and inventory with the court indicating the records that have been received and the date upon which the records were received. The criminal investigator or peace officer named in the court order may also file with the court the original of the attestation of authenticity and completeness.

Records produced pursuant to a court order for the production of records may be supplied in any form or format that is convenient for the business entity and that may be accessed by the Colorado criminal investigator or peace officer named in the court order or his or her agency or department. Production of records using proprietary software or another method that is not accessible shall not constitute compliance with the requirements of the court order. The court may order the defendant pay the cost of production of records.

A cause of action shall not lie against a business entity or an officer, director, or employee, for providing records pursuant to a court order for the production of records.

Nothing in this section shall preclude a Colorado criminal investigator or peace officer from seeking a search warrant.

The provisions of this section shall govern the procedures for court orders for the production of records. Motions to suppress evidence seized pursuant to a court order for the production of records shall be governed by the rules of criminal procedure.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Actual or constructive control" means the records are maintained or stored in any form or format on the premises of the business entity or at another location or facility under the custody or control of the business entity or a parent or subsidiary business, including pursuant to an agreement or contract with the business entity or any parent or subsidiary business and third-party service provider, in Colorado or elsewhere.

"Business entity" means a corporation or other entity that is subject to the provisions of title 7, C.R.S.; a foreign corporation qualified to do business in this state pursuant to article 115 of title 7, C.R.S., specifically including a federally chartered or authorized financial institution; a corporation or other entity that is subject to the provisions of title 11, C.R.S.; or a sole proprietorship or other association or group of individuals doing business in the state.

"Colorado criminal investigator" means an employee of the Colorado department of regulatory agencies, the Colorado department of labor and employment, or the Colorado department of revenue who has been classified as a criminal investigator by the director of the employing department.

"Peace officer" means a peace officer as described in section 16-2.5-101.

"Records" shall include all documents, electronic notations, journal entries, data, reports, statements, financial documentation, correspondence, electronic mail, or other information retained by a business entity in connection with business activity, but shall not include an item that is privileged pursuant to section 13-90-107, C.R.S., unless the person who possesses the privilege gives consent.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 978, § 17, effective April 17.

L. 2004:

(4)(a)(I), (6)(e), (11)(a), (11)(b), and (11)(d) amended, p. 1377, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(4)(c)(I), (5)(c), (6)(a), and (11)(c) amended, (HB 10-1132), ch. 122, p. 406, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2012:

(5)(b), (6)(a), and (6)(c) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 843, § 59, effective July 1.

16-3-301.5. Search warrant for firearms possessed by a respondent in an extreme risk protection order.

Any court may issue a search warrant to search for and take custody of any firearm in the possession of a named respondent in an extreme risk protection order or temporary extreme risk protection order filed pursuant to article 14.5 of title 13 if the application for the warrant complies with all required provisions of section 16-3-303 and also provides facts sufficient to establish by probable cause:

That the named person is a named respondent in an extreme risk protection order or temporary extreme risk protection order filed pursuant to article 14.5 of title 13; and

That the named person is in possession of one or more firearms; and

The location of such firearms; and

Any other information relied upon by the applicant and why the applicant considers such information credible and reliable.

The return or disposal of any firearm taken custody of pursuant to this section shall be accomplished pursuant to section 13-14.5-109.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1177), ch. 108, p. 399, § 3, effective April 12.

16-3-302. Search warrants - municipalities - inspections - grounds.

A search warrant may be issued by a judge of any municipal court by compliance with the applicable rule of the Colorado municipal court rules.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 200, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-302.

16-3-303. Search warrants - application.

A search warrant shall issue only on affidavit sworn to or affirmed before the judge and relating facts sufficient to:

Identify or describe, as nearly as may be, the premises, person, place, or thing to be searched;

Identify or describe, as nearly as may be, the property to be searched for, seized, or inspected;

Establish the grounds for issuance of the warrant or probable cause to believe that such grounds exist; and

Establish probable cause to believe that the property to be searched for, seized, or inspected is located at, in, or upon the premises, person, place, or thing to be searched.

The affidavit required by this section may include sworn testimony reduced to writing and signed under oath by the witness giving the testimony before issuance of the warrant. A copy of the affidavit and a copy of the transcript of testimony taken in support of the request for a search warrant shall be attached to the search warrant filed with the court.

Procedures governing application for and issuance of search warrants consistent with this section may be established by rule of the supreme court.

A no-knock search warrant shall be issued only if the affidavit for such warrant:

Complies with the provisions of subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section;

Specifically requests the issuance of a no-knock search warrant; and

Has been reviewed and approved for legal sufficiency and signed by a district attorney pursuant to section 20-1-106.1 (1)(b), C.R.S. Such review and approval may take place as allowed by statute or court rule or by means of facsimile transmission, telephonic transmission, or other electronic transfer.

If the grounds for the issuance of a no-knock search warrant are established by a confidential informant, the affidavit for such warrant shall contain a statement by the affiant concerning when such grounds became known or were verified by the affiant. The statement shall not identify the confidential informant.

For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "no-knock search warrant" means a search warrant served by entry without prior identification.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 200, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-303.

L. 2000:

(4), (5), and (6) added, p. 650, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(4)(c) amended, p. 1270, § 19, effective June 5.

16-3-303.5. Location information - search warrant required - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Electronic communication service" means a service that provides the ability to send or receive wire or electronic communications to users of the service.

"Electronic device" means a device that enables access to or use of an electronic communication service, remote computing service, or location information service.

"Government entity" means a state or local agency, including but not limited to a law enforcement entity or any other investigative entity, agency, department, division, bureau, board, or commission, or an individual acting or purporting to act for or on behalf of a state or local agency.

"Location information" means information concerning the location of an electronic device that, in whole or in part, is generated or derived from or obtained by the operation of an electronic device on a cellular telephone network or a location information service rather than obtained from a service provider.

"Location information service" means the provision of a global positioning service or other mapping, locational, or directional information service.

"Remote computing service" means the provision of computer storage or processing services by means of an electronic communications system.

Except as provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, a government entity shall not obtain the location information of an electronic device without a search warrant issued by a court pursuant to the provisions of this part 3, a subpoena, or a court order.

A government entity may obtain location information of an electronic device without a warrant, subpoena, or court order under any of the following circumstances:

The device is reported stolen by the owner;

In order to respond to the user's call for emergency services;

With the informed, affirmative consent of:

The owner or user of the electronic device;

The next of kin of the owner or user of the electronic device if the owner or user is believed to be deceased or is reported missing and unable to be contacted; or

The child's parent or legal guardian if the owner or user is under eighteen years of age;

There exist exigent circumstances such that the search would be recognized as constitutionally permissible without the warrant;

A representative of the government entity has a good faith belief that his or her actions were legal and, under the information available at the time, a reasonable person would believe that his or her actions were legal;

The owner or user of the electronic device has voluntarily or publicly disclosed the location information;

The electronic device has been abandoned by the owner or user; or

In accordance with any other judicially recognized exception to the search warrant requirement.

The provisions of this section do not apply to probation departments within the judicial department or to the division of adult parole within the department of corrections.

Any evidence obtained in violation of this section is not admissible in a civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding and shall not be used in an affidavit of probable cause in an effort to obtain a search warrant, subpoena, or court order. In order to seek suppression of evidence pursuant to this subsection (5) in any proceeding, the person seeking the suppression of evidence must have an ownership, leasehold, rental, or legitimate possessory interest in or a reasonable expectation of privacy in the electronic device at issue.

A court shall not admit location information obtained pursuant to this section or evidence derived from that information at a trial, hearing, or other proceeding unless the party seeking to introduce the evidence provides a copy of the warrant, subpoena, or court order and any accompanying affidavit to each party pursuant to rule 16 of the Colorado rules of criminal procedure, or any successor rule.

A court may waive the requirement under paragraph (a) of this subsection (6) if the court finds that it was not possible to provide a party with the warrant, subpoena, or court order and any accompanying application within the time required by rule 16 of the Colorado rules of criminal procedure, or any successor rule, and that the party will not be prejudiced by the delay in receiving the information.

An electronic communication service provider and its officers, employees, or agents are not liable for providing information, facilities, or assistance in compliance with the terms of a search warrant, subpoena, or court order issued pursuant to this section or when provided without a warrant, subpoena, or court order issued pursuant to this section or if otherwise provided for by law.

This section does not apply to a law enforcement agency obtaining basic subscriber information from an electronic communications service provider pursuant to a valid subpoena, court order, or search warrant.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-193), ch. 395, p. 1992, § 2, effective June 6.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 14-193, see section 1 of chapter 395, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

16-3-303.8. Testing for communicable diseases - court order required - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Communicable disease" means a disease or infection that is spread from one person to another through the exchange of blood or other bodily fluid and the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV).

"Emergency medical care provider" has the same meaning as defined in section 18-3-201 (1), C.R.S.

"Emergency medical service provider" has the same meaning as defined in section 18-3-201 (1.3), C.R.S.

"Firefighter" has the same meaning as defined in section 18-3-201 (1.5), C.R.S.

"Peace officer" means any person described in section 16-2.5-101.

Consent. Unless a person has admitted that he or she has a communicable disease and provides confirmation of the disease, a law enforcement agency shall ask a person to voluntarily consent to a blood test to determine if the person has a communicable disease if:

The person committed an assault in the first degree in violation of section 18-3-202, C.R.S.; assault in the second degree in violation of section 18-3-203, C.R.S.; or assault in the third degree in violation of section 18-3-204, C.R.S.; and

During or as a result of the assault, the person's blood or other bodily fluid came into contact with any victim of the assault, a peace officer, firefighter, or emergency medical care provider, or an emergency medical service provider, and there is reason to believe, based on information from a medical professional, the department of public health and environment, or a local health agency, that the victim of the assault, peace officer, firefighter, emergency medical care provider, or emergency medical service provider is at risk of transmission of a communicable disease.

Application.

A court shall order a person to submit blood required for a test for communicable diseases if an affidavit sworn to or affirmed before the judge establishes the following grounds for the order:

There is probable cause that a person committed the crime of assault in the first degree in violation of section 18-3-202, C.R.S.; assault in the second degree in violation of section 18-3-203, C.R.S.; or assault in the third degree in violation of section 18-3-204, C.R.S.;

The person has been asked to voluntarily submit to a blood test for a communicable disease and the person has refused; and

There is probable cause to believe that the person's blood or other bodily fluid came into contact with any victim of the assault, a peace officer, firefighter, or emergency medical care provider, or an emergency medical service provider, and there is reason to believe, based on information from a medical professional, the department of public health and environment, or a local health agency, that the victim of the assault, peace officer, firefighter, emergency medical care provider, or emergency medical service provider is at risk of transmission of a communicable disease.

The affidavit required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) may include sworn testimony reduced to writing and signed under oath by the witness giving the testimony before the issuance of the court order. A copy of the affidavit and a copy of the transcript of testimony taken in support of the request for the court order must be attached to a court order issued pursuant to this section.

Order. If the court is satisfied that grounds for the application exist or that there is probable cause to believe that the grounds exist, the court shall issue the court order, which shall:

Identify the name or description of the individual who is to give the blood;

Identify the names of any persons making affidavits for issuance of the order;

Identify the criminal offense concerning which the order has been issued;

Identify the name of the victim of the assault, peace officer, firefighter, emergency medical care provider, or emergency medical service provider;

Include a mandate to the officer to whom the order is directed to detain the person for only such time as is necessary to obtain the blood; and

Include the typewritten or printed name of the judge issuing the order and his or her signature.

Execution and return.

The blood tests must be conducted under medical supervision. A person who appears under an order of appearance issued pursuant to this section shall not be detained longer than is reasonably necessary to obtain the blood unless he or she is arrested for an offense.

The order may be executed and returned only within thirty-five days after its issuance.

The officer executing the order shall give a copy of the order to the person upon whom it is served.

Disclosure of results and confidentiality.

The results of any test on the blood obtained pursuant to an order issued under this section must be reported to the court or the court's designee, who shall then disclose the results to any person named in paragraph (d) of subsection (4) of this section who requests the disclosure.

Except as required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (6), the court shall keep the test results, disclosure of the test results, and any records relating to the test results or the disclosure of the test results confidential.

Voluntary submission. If a person described in paragraph

of subsection (3) of this section voluntarily submits to a test for communicable diseases, the fact of the person's voluntary submission is admissible in mitigation of sentence if the person is convicted of the charged offense.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1393), ch. 304, p. 1223, § 1, effective July 1.

16-3-304. Search warrants - contents.

If the judge is satisfied that grounds for the application exist or that there is probable cause to believe that such grounds exist, he shall issue a search warrant, which shall:

Identify or describe, as nearly as may be, the premises, person, place, or thing to be searched;

Identify or describe, as nearly as may be, the property to be searched for, seized, or inspected;

State the grounds or probable cause for its issuance; and

State the names of the persons whose affidavits or testimony have been taken in support thereof.

The search warrant may also contain such other and further orders as the judge deems necessary to comply with the provisions of a statute, charter, or ordinance, or to provide for the custody or delivery to the proper officer of any property seized under the warrant, or otherwise to accomplish the purposes of the warrant.

Unless the court otherwise directs, every search warrant authorizes the officer executing the same:

To execute and serve the warrant at any time; and

To use and employ such force as is reasonably necessary in the performance of the duties commanded by the warrant.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 201, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-304.

16-3-305. Search warrants - direction - execution and return.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a search warrant shall be directed to any officer authorized by law to execute it in the county wherein the property is located.

A search warrant issued by a judge of a municipal court shall be directed to any officer authorized by law to execute it in the municipality wherein the property is located.

Any judge issuing a search warrant, on the grounds stated in section 16-3-301, for the search of a person or for the search of any motor vehicle, aircraft, or other object which is mobile or capable of being transported may make an order authorizing a peace officer to be named in the warrant to execute the same, and the person named in such order may execute the warrant anywhere in the state. All sheriffs, coroners, police officers, and officers of the Colorado state patrol, when required, in their respective counties, shall aid and assist in the execution of such warrant. The order authorized by this subsection (3) may also authorize execution of the warrant by any officer authorized by law to execute it in the county wherein the property is located.

When any officer, having a warrant for the search of a person or for the search of any motor vehicle, aircraft, or other object which is mobile or capable of being transported is in pursuit thereof and the person, motor vehicle, aircraft, or other object crosses or enters into another county, such officer is authorized to execute the warrant in the other county.

It is the duty of all peace officers into whose hands any search warrant comes to execute the same, in their respective counties or municipalities, and make due return thereof. Procedures consistent with this section for the execution and return of search warrants may be provided by rule of the supreme court.

A search warrant shall be executed within fourteen days after its date.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 201, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-305.

L. 2012:

(6) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 844, § 60, effective July 1.

16-3-306. Search warrants - joinder.

The search of one or more persons, premises, places, or things, or any combination of persons, premises, places, or things, may be commanded in a single warrant or in separate warrants, if compliance is made with section 16-3-303 (1)(d).

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 202, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-306.

16-3-307. Limiting clause.

Nothing in this part 3 shall be construed to require the issuance of a search warrant in cases in which such warrant is not required by law. This statute does not modify any statute inconsistent with it, regulating search, seizure, and the issuance and execution of search warrants in circumstances for which special provision is made.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 202, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-307.

16-3-308. Evidence - admissibility - declaration of purpose - definitions.

Evidence which is otherwise admissible in a criminal proceeding shall not be suppressed by the trial court if the court determines that the evidence was seized by a peace officer, as described in section 16-2.5-101, as a result of a good faith mistake or of a technical violation.

As used in subsection (1) of this section:

"Good faith mistake" means a reasonable judgmental error concerning the existence of facts or law which if true would be sufficient to constitute probable cause.

"Technical violation" means a reasonable good faith reliance upon a statute which is later ruled unconstitutional, a warrant which is later invalidated due to a good faith mistake, or a court precedent which is later overruled.

Evidence which is otherwise admissible in a criminal proceeding and which is obtained as a result of a confession voluntarily made in a noncustodial setting shall not be suppressed by the trial court.

It is hereby declared to be the public policy of the state of Colorado that, when evidence is sought to be excluded from the trier of fact in a criminal proceeding because of the conduct of a peace officer leading to its discovery, it will be open to the proponent of the evidence to urge that the conduct in question was taken in a reasonable, good faith belief that it was proper, and in such instances the evidence so discovered should not be kept from the trier of fact if otherwise admissible. This section is necessary to identify the characteristics of evidence which will be admissible in a court of law. This section does not address or attempt to prescribe court procedure.

It shall be prima facie evidence that the conduct of the peace officer was performed in the reasonable good faith belief that it was proper if there is a showing that the evidence was obtained pursuant to and within the scope of a warrant, unless the warrant was obtained through intentional and material misrepresentation.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 922, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(2)(a) and (4) amended, p. 615, §§ 3, 4, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1614, § 7, effective August 6.

Cross references:

For the admissibility of evidence in proceedings under the "Colorado Children's Code", see § 19-2-803.

16-3-309. Admissibility of laboratory test results.

When evidence is seized in so small a quantity or unstable condition that qualitative laboratory testing will not leave a sufficient quantity of the evidence for independent analysis by the defendant's expert and when a state agent, in the regular performance of his duties, can reasonably foresee that the evidence might be favorable to the defendant, the trial court shall not suppress the prosecution's evidence if the court determines that the testing was performed in good faith and in accordance with regular procedures designed to preserve the evidence which might have been favorable to the defendant.

The trial court shall consider the following factors in determining, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, whether the state has met its obligation to preserve the evidence:

Whether or not a suspect has been identified and apprehended and whether or not the suspect has retained counsel or has had counsel appointed for him at the time of testing;

Whether the state should have used an available test method more likely to preserve the results of seized evidence;

Whether, when the test results are susceptible to subjective interpretation, the state should have photographed or otherwise documented the test results as evidence;

Whether the state should have preserved the used test samples;

Whether it was necessary for the state agency to conduct quantitative analysis of the evidence;

Whether there is a sufficient sample for the defendant's expert to utilize for analysis and the suspect or defendant has made a specific request to preserve such sample;

If paragraph (f) of this subsection (2) cannot be complied with, in view of the small amount of evidence, or when the state's duty to preserve the evidence would otherwise be enhanced, whether it was reasonable for the state to have contacted the defendant to determine if he wished his expert to be present during the testing.

With regard to testing performed on blood, urine, and breath samples which form the basis for a conclusion upon which a statutory presumption arises, it is hereby declared to be the public policy of the state of Colorado that when the prosecution's evidence of test results is sought to be excluded from the trier of fact in a criminal proceeding because the testing destroyed evidence which might have been favorable to the defense, it shall be open to the proponent of the evidence to urge that the testing in question was performed in good faith and in accordance with regular procedures designed to preserve the evidence which might have been favorable to the defense, and, in such instances, the evidence so discovered should not be kept from the trier of fact if otherwise admissible.

For all other types of blood analysis, breath analysis, and urine analysis and for laboratory testing, such as serial number restoration, firearms testing, and gunpowder pattern testing, it is hereby declared to be the public policy of the state of Colorado that, when the prosecution's evidence of test results is sought to be excluded from the trier of fact in a criminal proceeding because of the destruction of evidence upon which the test was performed, it shall be open to the proponent of the evidence to urge that the testing in question was performed in a reasonable, good faith belief that it was proper and, in such instances, the evidence so discovered should not be kept from the trier of fact if otherwise admissible.

Any report or copy thereof or the findings of the criminalistics laboratory shall be received in evidence in any court, preliminary hearing, or grand jury proceeding in the same manner and with the same force and effect as if the employee or technician of the criminalistics laboratory who accomplished the requested analysis, comparison, or identification had testified in person. Any party may request that such employee or technician testify in person at a criminal trial on behalf of the state before a jury or to the court, by notifying the witness and other party at least fourteen days before the date of such criminal trial.

In no event shall evidence be suppressed which results from laboratory testing performed before identification of a suspect for the sole reason that the later identified suspect or his attorney was not present at the time of the testing.

This section is necessary to identify the characteristics of evidence which will be admissible in a court of law. This section does not address or attempt to prescribe court procedure.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 483, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(5) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 844, § 61, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For statutory presumptions in alcohol-related traffic offenses, see §§ 18-3-106, 18-3-205, and 42-4-1301.